Maryland, session 2026, HB0080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–212.5.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0080*

HOUSE BILL 80
(2) “DWELLING UNIT” MEANS THAT PORTION OF A BUILDING THAT IS
DESIGNATED, INTENDED, OR ARRANGED FOR USE OR OCCUPANCY AS A RESIDENCE
BY ONE OR MORE PERSONS, INCLUDING A RENTED ROOM IN A SINGLE–FAMILY
HOUSE.
(3) “FEE” MEANS A CHARGE, A COST, OR A MONETARY OBLIGATION
OTHER THAN RENT.
(4) “MANDATORY FEE” MEANS A COMPULSORY FEE IMPOSED ON A
TENANT AS A CONDITION OF TENANCY.
(5) (I) “OPTIONAL FEE” MEANS A VOLUNTARY FEE THAT A TENANT
MAY ELECT TO PAY A LANDLORD FOR BENEFITS OR SERVICES RELATED TO THE
TENANCY.
(II) “OPTIONAL FEE” INCLUDES A FEE FOR PARKING, STORAGE,
OR PETS.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO:
(I) A LEASE SIGNED OR RENEWED ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1,
2026; AND
(II) A LANDLORD THAT OFFERS FOUR OR MORE DWELLING
UNITS FOR RENT.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) CHARGES IMPOSED ON A TENANT FOR THE PAYMENT OF
WATER, TRASH COLLECTION, SEWER, GAS, OR ELECTRIC UTILITIES;
(II) COSTS, FINES, OR FEES FOR MINOR VIOLATIONS OF A LEASE
AGREEMENT, OR OTHER IRREGULAR COSTS INCURRED AS A RESULT OF A TENANT’S
ACTIONS, SUCH AS A CHARGE FOR A REPLACEMENT KEY OR A PENALTY FOR A
VIOLATION OF THE BYLAWS OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY IF THE
DWELLING UNIT IS LOCATED IN A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; OR
(III) THE WITHHOLDING OF ANY PORTION OF A SECURITY
DEPOSIT AT THE END OF A TENANCY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–203 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) A LANDLORD SHALL, IN WRITING, PROVIDE A PROSPECTIVE
TENANT WITH AN ITEMIZED LIST THAT CLEARLY IDENTIFIES ALL FEES THAT A

HOUSE BILL 80 3
LANDLORD MAY IMPOSE ON THE PROSPECTIVE TENANT AND INCLUDES THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) THE BASIS FOR THE FEE;
(II) THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE;
(III) WHETHER THE FEE IS A MANDATORY FEE OR AN OPTIONAL
FEE; AND
(IV) WHEN THE FEE IS DUE, INCLUDING WHETHER THE FEE IS
LUMP SUM, MONTHLY, OR PERIODIC IN SOME OTHER WAY.
(2) A LANDLORD MAY NOT IMPOSE A MANDATORY FEE ON A TENANT
THAT IS NOT DISCLOSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) A LEASE PROVISION THAT IS IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE
VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE.
(E) (1) A TENANT MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A LANDLORD FOR A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION THAT OCCURRED:
(I) ON OR AFTER FEBRUARY 1, 2027; AND
(II) DURING THE TENANCY OR UP TO 2 YEARS AFTER THE
TENANCY EXPIRED.
(2) IF A COURT DETERMINES THAT A LANDLORD VIOLATED A
PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT MAY AWARD DAMAGES EQUAL TO THREE
TIMES THE AMOUNT OF ACTUAL DAMAGES THAT RESULTED FROM THE VIOLATION
AND REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(F) (1) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY ENACT LOCAL LAWS
CONSISTENT WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) ANY LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE THAT IS COMPARABLE IN
SUBJECT MATTER TO THIS SECTION SHALL SUPERSEDE THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SECTION TO THE EXTENT THAT THE LOCAL LAW OR ORDINANCE IS MORE STRINGENT
OR PROVIDES STRONGER PROTECTION TO A TENANT OR BROADER APPLICABILITY
THAN THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.